Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-29] Show cause hearing. At any
stage of the proceeding, the court may set a show cause hearing at which a
child's parents shall have the burden of presenting evidence as to why the case
should not be set for a termination of parental rights or legal guardianship
hearing. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next